Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 2. Seasons, Waters, and Limits
fishing Only when such rivers and streams are open to trout fishing except as prohibited by Section 9.2 No restrictions 5 fish Lake Morey, Fairlee Angling (Ice fishing— see special provisions) Second Saturday in June through Nov. 30
Largemouth bass — Minimum length of 14 inches 5 Fish Lake Morey, Fairlee Open-water fishing Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only Dec. 1 through Friday before the Second Saturday in June, both dates inclusive. All
bass must be released Zero —All bass must be immediately released. Kent Pond, Killington and Baker Pond, Brookfield Open-water fishing Second Saturday in June through Nov. 30 Largemouth Bass: protected slot: 10-12 inches (all fish
between 10 & 12 inches must be released) 10 fish, only 1 fish greater than 12 inches. Kent Pond, Killington and Baker Pond, Brookfield Open-water fishing: Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only Dec. 1 through Friday
before the Second Saturday in June, both dates inclusive. All bass must be released Zero —All bass must be immediately released

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters and Lake Champlain (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing First Saturday in May through March 15 Minimum length of 18 inches 3 Fish Lake Carmi, Franklin
Open-water and ice fishing First Saturday in May through March 15 Minimum length of 15 inches Protected lengths — 17 to 19 inches (all fish between 17 & 19 inches must be released) 5 fish, provided only 1 is over 19 inches Chittenden
Reservoir, Chittenden Open-water and ice fishing June 1 through March 15 Minimum length of 22 inches 2 fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters and Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No open season Any fish taken must be immediately released. Zero — All Sauger taken must be immediately released.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended 1963, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Aug. 23, 1963; 1966, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 1, 1967; 1968, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; 1971, Fish and
Game Board Reg. No. 840, eff. March 19, 1971; 1971, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. June 21, 1971; 1973, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 866, eff. Jan. 20, 1973; 1974, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 892, eff. Dec. 26, 1974; 1975, Fish
and Game Board Reg. No. 895, eff. Jan. 1, 1976; 1976, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 899, eff. Jan. 1, 1977; 1977, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 904, § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1978;

1977, No. 245
(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Apr. 17, 1978; 1978, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 906, eff. Oct. 21, 1978; 1979, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 913, eff. Nov. 21, 1979; 1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 915, eff. June 30, 1980;
1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 926, §§ 1-7, eff. Jan. 1, 1981; 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 936, §§ 1, 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1983; 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 942, eff. June 9, 1983; 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 946,
eff. Oct. 17, 1983; 1984, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 950, eff. Sept. 17, 1984; 1984, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 951, eff. Sept. 17, 1984;

1985, No. 953
, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1985, No. 49
;

1986, No. 962
, eff. June 6, 1986; 1987, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 971, eff. Sept. 17, 1987; 1990, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 980, eff. Feb. 23, 1990; 1991, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 982, eff. Jan. 5, 1991; 1991,
Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 990, eff. Sept. 1991; 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 998, eff. March 23, 1993; 1995, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Jan. 2, 1996; 1997, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff.
Nov. 1, 1997; 1999, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. March 13, 1999; 2000 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Oct. 7, 2000; 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Dec. 6, 2002; 2004, Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. June 4, 2004; 2005, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. July 21, 2005; 2005A, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. March 31, 2006; 2007, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Sept. 1,
2006; 2008, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; 2010 Fish and Wildlife Reg. effective Jan. 1, 2011; 2013 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2014; 2015 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2016; 2017 Fish and Wildlife
Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2018; 2018 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2019; 2021 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2022.